Hawaii statutes.
§346-3 Compensation of employees. The
compensation of all personnel in the department of human services shall be
fixed by the director of human services pursuant to any applicable
classification law. [L 1941, c 296, §1(4); RL 1945, §4804; am L 1951, c 264,
§2; RL 1955, §107-4; HRS §346-3; am L 1970, c 105, §5; am L 1987, c 339, §4]

Cross References

Classification law, see §76-13.5.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next